Maryland, session 2025, HB0401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
10–503.
(a) (2) (i) Each fund consists of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0401*

HOUSE BILL 401
1. profits derived from the sale of goods through the
commissary operation [and telephone] and vending machine commissions; and
2. subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, money
received from other sources.
(ii) Money from the General Fund of the State may not be
transferred by budget amendment or otherwise to a fund.
SUBTITLE 10. NO–CHARGE TELEPHONE COMMUNICATIONS FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS.
10–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “TELEPHONE EQUIPMENT” MEANS A TELEPHONE OR OTHER
DEVICE OR SYSTEM THAT ENABLES A USER TO MAKE VOICE COMMUNICATION USING
A TELEPHONE SERVICE.
(2) “TELEPHONE EQUIPMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE EQUIPMENT FOR
VIDEO COMMUNICATION.
(C) “TELEPHONE SERVICE” MEANS:
(1) LANDLINE TELEPHONE SERVICE;
(2) WIRELESS OR CELLULAR TELEPHONE SERVICE;
(3) VOICE OVER INTERNET PROTOCOL (VOIP) SERVICE, AS DEFINED
IN § 8–601 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE; OR
(4) ANY OTHER SIMILAR SERVICE CAPABLE OF BEING USED FOR
VOICE COMMUNICATION, REGARDLESS OF THE TECHNOLOGY.
(D) “TELEPHONE SERVICE PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE
BUSINESS OF PROVIDING TELEPHONE EQUIPMENT OR A TELEPHONE SERVICE FOR
A FEE.
10–1002.

HOUSE BILL 401 3
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO TELEPHONE EQUIPMENT OR A TELEPHONE
SERVICE THAT A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY HAS AUTHORIZED AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO USE IN THE FACILITY.
10–1003.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A STATE
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE PAYMENT OF ANY COST
CHARGED BY A TELEPHONE SERVICE PROVIDER FOR THE USE OF TELEPHONE
EQUIPMENT AND A TELEPHONE SERVICE BY AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
CONFINED IN THE FACILITY.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO REQUIRE A
STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY TO PAY A COST THAT THE FACILITY DISPUTES IS
OWED TO A TELEPHONE SERVICE PROVIDER.
(B) A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY AND A TELEPHONE SERVICE
PROVIDER MAY NOT CHARGE AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR A THIRD PARTY,
INCLUDING THE RECIPIENT OF A TELEPHONE CALL, FOR AN INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUAL’S USE OF TELEPHONE EQUIPMENT OR TELEPHONE SERVICES IN A
STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(C) A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL ESTABLISH A RATIO OF TEN
INDIVIDUALS TO ONE TELEPHONE.
(D) AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S ACCESS TO OR USE OF TELEPHONE
EQUIPMENT AND TELEPHONE SERVICES MAY NOT SUPPLANT TIME THAT THE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL IS ENTITLED TO IN–PERSON VISITATION.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A
STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY FROM DISABLING TELEPHONE SERVICES FOR
DISCIPLINARY MATTERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Costs of Telephone Communications Advisory Committee.
(b) The Advisory Committee consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;

HOUSE BILL 401
(3) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Public Defender, or the Public Defender’s designee;
(5) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
(6) the following members designated by the Secretary of Public Safety and
Correctional Services:
(i) one member who is employed by the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services and whose primary responsibility is to implement and maintain
communication services for incarcerated individuals; and
(ii) one member who is employed as a correctional officer in a State
correctional facility; and
(7) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) one member who represents a nonprofit organization that
primarily advocates for no–charge prison phone call programs;
(ii) two members who were formally incarcerated in a State
correctional facility;
(iii) two members who are currently incarcerated in a State
correctional facility;
(iv) one member who represents a nonprofit organization that
primarily advocates for job opportunities and low–wage workers;
(v) one member who represents a nonprofit organization that
primarily advocates for criminal justice reform to improve reentry of incarcerated
individuals; and
(vi) one member who represents a correctional officers’ union.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Advisory Committee.
(d) The Department of Legislative Services shall provide staff for the Advisory
Committee.
(e) A member of the Advisory Committee:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Advisory Committee;
but

HOUSE BILL 401 5
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Advisory Committee shall:
(1) review and analyze data related to no–charge prison and jail phone call
programs in other states;
(2) review and analyze data from the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services related to the use of telephone equipment and telephone services,
including monthly volume;
(3) review and analyze contracts for telephone equipment and telephone
service in State correctional facilities, including the rates and fees paid by the Department
of Public Safety and Correctional Services and fees charged to users for the services
provided;
(4) make recommendations to lower the projected cost of providing
no–charge prison phone calls in the State; and
(5) make recommendations to efficiently implement a no–charge prison
phone call program under Title 10, Subtitle 10 of the Correctional Services Article.
(g) On or before December 31, 2025, the Advisory Committee shall report its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain
effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with
no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further
force and effect.